Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.350

Conflict with federal requirements.

If any part of this chapter is found to conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter.

[ 1981 2nd ex.s. c 11 s 1.]